Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-15,237
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act are to:

(1) Protect the air, water, and land of the state through the certification and regulation of private onsite wastewater treatment system professionals in Nebraska;

(2) Require that all siting, layout, construction, closure, reconstruction, alteration, modification, repair, inspection, or pumping of any private onsite wastewater treatment system be done by certified professionals, professional engineers licensed in Nebraska, or environmental health specialists registered in Nebraska in accordance with the act and rules and regulations adopted under the act;

(3) Provide for the registration of all private onsite wastewater treatment systems constructed, reconstructed, altered, or modified after August 31, 2003;

(4) Provide for review of plans and specifications, issuance of permits and approvals, construction standards, and requirements necessary for proper operation and maintenance of all private onsite wastewater treatment systems;

(5) Protect the health and general welfare of the citizens of Nebraska; and

(6) Protect the air, water, and land of the state from potential pollution by providing for proper siting, layout, construction, closure, reconstruction, alteration, modification, repair, and pumping of private onsite wastewater treatment systems.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB333, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB328, § 1.